hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.dic
аздау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
айғыздау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
алдыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
апатайлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
арту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
асыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
аунау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ашқарақтану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бадыраю/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
балағаттау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
баспалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
батырымсу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бақшию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бейпілдену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
беткейлеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бойсұну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
борсылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
былықтыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бүксу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бұлыңғырлану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бөкселеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дарбию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
доғару/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дәуірлену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ендіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жабдықтандыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жалпыштану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жармалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жаңаттау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жону/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жіберу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
зарядтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
имеңдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кежірею/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
керенаулану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
компенсациялау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
күйгелектеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
күшейту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
көптеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
майландыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
малыңқырау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
масығу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мегзеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мисыздану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мысалдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мұжғылау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мөңірету/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ойысу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
осқылау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
палау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
реттестіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
самалдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
саяздану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
семірту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
солбаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сусындау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сырбаздау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сіңіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сұрасу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тайғанау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тарпылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
теңеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
толғану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
торалу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тоғысу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
туылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тырағайлату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тықсырылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тірілту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түйретілу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түнікелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түсінісу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тұндыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тұштақтату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
төлену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
төңбекшіту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
хикаялау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шайқақтату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шамдандыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шарпыту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шашақтандыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шаңғырлаттыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шетендену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шойнаңдату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шоқаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шытынау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шұңғылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ырсию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ілбию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қажалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қалжау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қармаласу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қасқару/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қауымдасу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қақтыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қиту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қойылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қорбию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қоялау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қызбалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қыстыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
құйсқандасу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
құрағыту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
үймелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
үрлеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ұйығу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ұғыну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
өзімсіну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
өңкию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
